Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 11. Mississippi Home Corporation Act.

§ 43-33-701.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Home Corporation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-702.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

That there exists in the State of Mississippi a severe shortage of adequate, safe and sanitary residential and rental housing available at prices or rentals within the financial means of persons of low or moderate income; that this shortage has contributed to and will contribute to the creation and persistence of substandard living conditions and is damaging to the health, welfare and prosperity of the residents of this state.

That private enterprise and investment have been unable, without assistance, to produce the needed construction or rehabilitation of adequate, safe and sanitary housing at prices or rentals which persons of low or moderate income can afford and to provide sufficient long-term mortgage financing for residential or rental housing for occupancy by such persons;

That the shortage of adequate and affordable housing can best be addressed through a strong, unified organization which can develop creative approaches to housing production and assistance through active cooperation of public and private entities, including federal, state and local government, private nonprofit and for profit entities, community and citizens groups, charitable organizations, and private citizens; that this organization should stimulate private development, construction and rehabilitation, develop a wide range of state housing assistance programs, engage in comprehensive planning, study, research and statewide coordination with respect to low and moderate housing, provide technical, educational and consultative services, and promote governmental and community interest in the provision of housing for low and moderate income persons in the state; that this organization should receive appropriations of public funds, should be authorized to obtain funding for its programs by issuing its bonds and notes; and that this organization should be authorized to administer available federal, state or local programs and monies and to retain for its corporate purposes all such fees and income generated thereby;

To aid in remedying these conditions and to accomplish these public purposes, effective September 1, 1989, there is created a public body corporate and politic, separate and apart from the state, constituting a governmental instrumentality, to be known as the Mississippi Home Corporation, for the performance of essential public functions. The corporation shall be constituted and shall have such powers as provided in this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 43-33-703.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Bonds” or “notes” means the bonds or notes, respectively, issued by the corporation pursuant to this article;

“Corporation” means the Mississippi Home Corporation;

“Energy conservation loan” means a mortgage loan made to a person of low or moderate income to finance improvements made or to be made to the residential housing owned and occupied by such person for the purposes of conserving energy and reducing the energy costs attributable to such residential housing, and containing such terms and conditions as the corporation may require;

“Housing development mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan made to finance or refinance the acquisition, construction or substantial rehabilitation of a housing development, including both construction loans and permanent loans;

“Housing development” means any specific work located within the state and made available to persons of low or moderate income for rental or residential housing purposes, including any building, land, equipment, facility or other real or personal property which may be necessary, convenient or desirable in connection therewith including streets, sewers, water and utility services;

“Mortgage” means a mortgage, mortgage deed or deed of trust on a fee interest in residential housing or a rental housing development or, on real property in which the fee interest is owned without limitation by a unit of government or other entity created by statute, a leasehold on such a fee interest of a duration satisfactory to the corporation, which shall in all events exceed the term of the security interest created by the mortgagee;

“Mortgage lender” means any bank, bank or trust company, trust company, mortgage company, mortgage banker, national banking association, savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, and any other lending institution; provided that such lender is domiciled or qualified to do business in this state;

“Mortgage loan” means a financial obligation secured by a mortgage, including any portion thereof or participation therein in any new or existing mortgage loan;

“Municipality” means any county, city, town or village of the state;

“Persons of low or moderate income” means persons or families, irrespective of race, color, national origin, sex, religion, age or handicap, within the state, who are determined by the corporation to require such assistance as is made available pursuant to this article on account of insufficient personal or family income to reasonably afford decent, safe and sanitary residential or rental housing, taking into consideration, without limitation, such factors as the following: (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs; (ii) the size of the family; (iii) the cost and condition of residential or rental housing facilities in their locality or in an area reasonably accessible to such locality; (iv) the ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal, private residential or rental housing market and to pay the amounts for which private enterprise is providing sanitary, decent and safe residential or rental housing in their locality or in an area reasonably accessible to such locality; (v) the standards established by various programs of the federal government for determining eligibility based on income of such persons and families and, in the case of projects with respect to which income limits have been established by any agency of the federal government having jurisdiction thereover for the purpose of defining eligibility of low and moderate income families, the corporation may determine that the limits so established shall govern; in all other cases income limits for the purpose of defining low or moderate income persons shall be established by the corporation in its rules and regulations;

“Qualified sponsors” means any person, corporation, partnership or association, profit or nonprofit, public or private, which provides or develops residential or rental housing for low and moderate income families;

“Residential housing” means a specific work or improvement undertaken to provide an owner-occupied residence within the state, which shall become the principal residence of the owner within a reasonable time after the financing is provided;

“State” means the State of Mississippi;

“State agency” means any board, authority, agency, department, commission, public corporation, body politic or instrumentality of the state;

“Local housing authority” or “regional housing authority” means a public body corporate and politic organized and operating pursuant to Title 43, Chapter 33, Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended, or a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi and designated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as a public housing agency within the meaning of Section 3(6) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 43-33-704.
Mississippi Home Corporation created; vesting in corporation of functions, property, rights and powers of Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation; continuation of regulations; powers generally; qualifications, appointment and terms of members; vacancies; removal; officers; ex officio members; declaration of public purpose and legislative intent.

There is created by this article the Mississippi Home Corporation, which shall be a continuation of the corporate existence of the Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation and (a) all property, rights and powers of the Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation are vested in, and shall be exercised by, the corporation, subject, however, to all pledges, covenants, agreements, undertakings and trusts made or created by the Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation; (b) all references to the Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation in any other law or regulation shall be deemed to refer to and apply to the corporation; and (c) all regulations of the Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation shall continue to be in effect as the regulations of the corporation until amended, supplemented or rescinded by the corporation in accordance with law.

The corporation is created with power to: raise funds from private investors in order to make such private funds available to finance the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation and improvement of residential and rental housing for persons of low or moderate income within the state; provide financing to qualified sponsors or individuals for a wide range of loans including, but not limited to, housing development, mortgage, rehabilitation or energy conservation loans; make loans to private lenders to finance any of these loans; purchase any of these loans from private lenders; refinance, insure or guarantee any of these loans; provide for temporary or partial financing for any of these purposes; develop, operate and administer housing programs which further its stated goals of improving the availability, affordability and quality of low and moderate income housing in the state; and make grants or loans to private nonprofit developers, local governments or private persons in furtherance of these goals;

The corporation shall be composed of thirteen (13) members. The Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint the members of the corporation, who shall be residents of the state and shall not hold other public office. There shall be at least one (1) member and not more than three (3) members appointed from each of the five (5) congressional districts in existence on January 1, 1989, and, in addition, from and after September 1, 1980, (i) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in the savings and loan association business, the commercial banking business or the mortgage banking business, (ii) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in the residential housing construction industry, (iii) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in the licensed residential housing brokerage business, and (iv) at least one (1) member shall be a member of the general public not engaged in any business, industry or activity described in clauses (i) through (iii) of this subparagraph; from and after September 1, 1989, (i) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in the manufactured housing business; (ii) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in nonprofit housing development in a Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA); (iii) at least one (1) member shall have at least three (3) years’ experience and background in nonprofit housing development outside a MSA; and (iv) at least (1) member shall be a low or moderate income person qualified for assistance under this article.

The term of office of the members of the corporation who are serving pursuant to this subsection (3) shall terminate on May 23, 2000.

From and after May 23, 2000, the corporation shall be composed of nine (9) members. The Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint six (6) members of the corporation, who shall be residents of the state. The Governor shall appoint two (2) members from each Supreme Court District. The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint three (3) members of the corporation, who shall be residents of the state. The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each Supreme Court District. Two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor for an initial term of two (2) years, two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor for an initial term of four (4) years, and two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor for an initial term of six (6) years. One (1) member shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for an initial term of two (2) years, one (1) member shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for an initial term of four (4) years, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for an initial term of six (6) years. Thereafter, the terms of members appointed by the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be as provided in subsection (5) of this section. In the appointment process, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor will attempt to see that all portions of society and its diversity are represented in the membership of the corporation. In the appointment process, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor will attempt to see that persons with substantial housing and financial experience are represented in the membership of the corporation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(b) and subsection (4) of this section, appointments shall be for terms of six (6) years. Each member shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the appropriate appointing authority, subject to the advice and consent of the Senate, for the length of the unexpired term only. Any member of the corporation shall be eligible for reappointment. Any member of the corporation may be removed by the appointing authority for misfeasance, malfeasance or willful neglect of duty after reasonable notice and a public hearing, unless the same are expressly waived in writing. Each member of the corporation shall before entering upon his duty take an oath of office to administer the duties of his office faithfully and impartially, and a record of such oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The corporation shall annually elect from its membership a chairman who shall be eligible for reelection. The corporation shall annually elect from its membership a vice chairman who shall be eligible for reelection. The corporation shall also elect or appoint, and prescribe the duties of, such other officers (who need not be members) as the corporation deems necessary or advisable, and the corporation shall fix the compensation of such officers. The corporation may delegate to one or more of its members, officers, employees or agents such powers and duties as it may deem proper, not inconsistent with this article or other provisions of law.

In accomplishing its purposes, the corporation is acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state and the performance of essential public functions and is serving a vital public purpose in approving and otherwise promoting their health, welfare and prosperity, and the enactment of the provisions hereinafter set forth is for a valid public purpose and is hereby so declared to be such as a matter of express legislative determination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2000.).

§ 43-33-705.
Fiduciary bond; premiums.

All directors, officers, employees or agents exercising any voting power or discretionary authority shall be required prior to the issuance of any bonds by the corporation to have issued by a surety company licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi a fiduciary bond in the amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for the faithful performance of their duties. The corporation shall pay the premiums on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-707.
Appointment of officers; executive director; secretary; treasurer; employment of counsel.

The corporation shall appoint, and prescribe the duties of, such officers (who need not be directors) as the corporation deems necessary or advisable, including an executive director and a secretary (who may be the same person), and the corporation shall fix the compensation of such officers. The executive director shall be appointed with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board. The executive director shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business of the corporation, subject to the policies, control and direction of the directors of the corporation. The secretary of the corporation shall keep a record of the proceedings of the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the corporation, the minute book or journal of the corporation, and its official seal. He shall have authority to cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the corporation and to give certificates under the official seal of the corporation to the effect that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the corporation may rely upon the certificates. The treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the corporation, except for those assets required by contracts with bondholders to be in the custody of the trustee. The directors of the corporation shall set the investment policy for assets, and the executive director shall be responsible for making investments in accordance with such policy. The treasurer may delegate all or a portion of his duties and responsibilities to the executive director.

The corporation shall have the authority, in its discretion, to employ counsel on an annual basis at an annual salary at an amount it deems proper. Such counsel may, in addition to an annual salary, be paid additional compensation when employed by the corporation in the matter of litigation and the issuance of bonds and the drafting of orders and resolutions in connection therewith.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2000.).

§ 43-33-709.
Meetings of corporation; notice; quorum.

The corporation shall hold regular meetings as set forth in its bylaws. Special meetings of the corporation shall be held at the call of the chairperson or whenever any three (3) members shall so request in writing. Each director shall be given not less than three (3) days’ written notice of special meetings, unless at least seven (7) directors have agreed to the scheduling of the special meeting. Notice of special meetings may be oral or written. Written notice shall be effected by first class mail or by any more rapid means. Written notice is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in U.S. mail.

A majority of members then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business and for the exercise of any power or function of the corporation. No vacancy in the membership of the corporation shall impair the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and to perform all the duties of the corporation. If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors.

Directors may participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-711.
Creation of committees; members.

The board of directors may create one or more committees of the board and appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two (2) or more directors who serve at the pleasure of the board.

The creation of a committee and appointment of directors to it must be approved by a majority of all directors in office when the action is taken.

Sections of this article which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 627, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2000.).

§ 43-33-713.
Minutes of meetings; accounting records; other records.

The corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by committees of the board of directors.

The corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

The corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

The corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its office:

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

The minutes of all meetings of the board of directors and records of all actions approved by the directors for the past three (3) years;

A list of the names and business or home addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent status report delivered to the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-715.
Nonprofit nature of corporation; directors to serve without compensation; per diem allowance; payment of expenses.

The corporation is not created or organized, and its operations shall not be conducted, for the purpose of making a profit. No part of the revenues or assets of the corporation shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to its directors or officers or other private persons, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Directors of the corporation shall serve without compensation; provided that all members, except ex officio members, shall receive the per diem established in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for their attendance at meetings; and all directors shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual and reasonable expenses incurred as a necessary incident to service on the corporation, including mileage, as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-33-717.
Powers of corporation.

The corporation shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management;

To sue and be sued, have a seal and alter the same at pleasure, and maintain an office at such place or places in the state as it may determine;

To appoint officers, agents and employees, prescribe their duties and qualifications, and fix their compensation;

To acquire real or personal property, or any interest therein, by purchase, exchange, gift, assignment, transfer, foreclosure, lease, condemnation or otherwise, including rights or easements; to hold, manage, operate or improve real or personal property; to sell, assign, exchange, lease, encumber, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, or any interest therein, or deed of trust or mortgage lien interest owned by it or under its control, custody or in its possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it and to do any of the foregoing by public sale;

To make and execute agreements, contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation under this article;

To employ or contract with architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, financial experts and other advisors as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix and pay their compensation;

To make and execute contracts for the administration, servicing or collection of any mortgage loan and pay the reasonable value of services rendered to the corporation pursuant to such contracts;

To contract for the employment of a financial advisor, underwriting attorneys, trustees, paying agents, depositories or any consultants retained in connection with the issuance of any bonds or notes including refunding bonds or notes or dealing with the disposition of any proceeds thereof;

To issue negotiable bonds and notes and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to sell any mortgage loans at public or private sale at the fair market value for such a mortgage; and

Subject to any agreement with bondholders and noteholders, to make, alter or repeal such rules and regulations with respect to the operations, properties and facilities of the corporation as are necessary to carry out its functions and duties in the administration of this article.

The corporation shall also have the power:

To make loans to mortgage lenders for the purpose of:

Making housing development mortgage loans to qualified sponsors for low and moderate income rental or residential housing;

Making loans to low and moderate income purchasers of residential housing with preference to those who are displaced from adequate housing as a result of a major disaster, whether it be a man-made, technological or natural disaster, upon a declaration by the Governor that a major disaster exists in the state;

To purchase from mortgage lenders any of the loans enumerated in subparagraphs (i) and (ii);

To insure, reinsure or guarantee any of the types of loans enumerated in subparagraphs (i) and (ii);

To make, in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as the corporation shall approve, temporary loans, preconstruction loans, interim financing loans to any qualified sponsor and permanent financing to any qualified sponsor of multifamily housing.

The corporation shall also have the power to make loans from funds not otherwise encumbered by pledge or indenture to low and moderate income persons for the following purposes:

Purchasing, improving or rehabilitating existing residential housing and occupied by the owners;

Making loans to qualified nonprofit sponsors, to local housing authorities and to owners of residential housing for the development, construction, purchase, rehabilitation, weatherization or maintenance of residential housing.

Using funds not otherwise encumbered by pledge or indenture, the corporation may:

Establish a rental assistance program;

Provide such advisory consultation, training and educational services as will assist in the planning, construction, rehabilitation and operation of housing, including but not limited to, assistance in community development and organization, home management and advisory services for residents, and in promotion of community organizations and local governments to assist in developing housing;

Encourage research and demonstration projects to develop new and better methods for increasing the supply, types and financing of housing and to receive and accept contributions, grants or aid from any source, public or private, including but not limited to the United States and this state, for carrying out this purpose;

Encourage and stimulate cooperatives and other forms of housing with tenant participation;

Promote innovative programs for home ownership, including but not limited to lease-purchase programs, employer-sponsored housing programs, tenant cooperatives and nonprofit associations;

Design and support programs to address special needs groups including, but not limited to, handicapped, disabled, elderly, homeless, HIV/AIDS carriers and families with children;

Develop a comprehensive plan for, and engage in a yearly planning process for, addressing the housing needs of low and moderate income persons in Mississippi.

The corporation also has the power:

To procure, or require the procurement of, insurance against any loss in connection with its operations, including without limitation the repayment of any mortgage loan or loans, in such amounts and from such insurers, including the federal government, as it may deem necessary or desirable, and to pay any premiums therefor;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders: (i) to renegotiate any loan in default; (ii) to waive any default or consent to the modification of the terms of any loan or agreement; (iii) to commence, prosecute and enforce a judgment in any action or proceeding, including without limitation a foreclosure proceeding, to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by law, mortgage loan agreement, contract or other agreement; (iv) and in connection with any such proceeding, to bid for and purchase the property or acquire or take possession thereof and, in such event, complete, administer and pay the principal of and interest on any obligations incurred in connection with such property and dispose of and otherwise deal with such property in such manner as the corporation may deem advisable to protect its interest therein;

To fix, revise, charge and collect fees and other charges in connection with the making of loans, the purchasing of mortgage loans, and any other services rendered by the corporation;

To arrange for guarantees of its bonds, notes or other obligations by the federal government or by any private insurer and to pay any premiums therefor;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, but subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to invest money of the corporation not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds or notes;

In obligations of any municipality or the state or the United States of America;

In obligations the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state or the United States of America;

In obligations of any corporation wholly owned by the United States of America;

In obligations of any corporation sponsored by the United States of America which are, or may become, eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;

In obligations of insurance firms or other corporations whose investments are rated “A” or better by recognized rating companies;

In certificates of deposit or time deposits of qualified depositories of the state as approved by the State Depository Commission, secured in such manner, if any, as the corporation shall determine;

In contracts for the purchase and sale of obligations of the type specified in items (i) through (v) above;

In repurchase agreements secured by obligations specified in items (i) through (v) above;

In money market funds, the assets of which are required to be invested in obligations specified in items (i) through (vi) above;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to purchase, and to agree to purchase, bonds or notes of the corporation at a price not exceeding: (i) if the bonds or notes are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the date of purchase; or (ii) if the bonds or notes are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption at the option of the corporation plus accrued interest to the date of purchase;

Subject to the provisions of this article, to contract for and to accept any gifts, grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from federal, state or local governments, private or public entities, or individuals;

To enter into agreements or other transactions with the federal or state government, any agency thereof or any municipality in furtherance of the purposes of this article; to operate and administer loan programs of the federal government, the State of Mississippi, or any governmental agency thereof; and to operate and administer any program of housing assistance for persons and families of low or moderate income, however funded;

To establish a benevolent loan fund, housing development fund, or such additional and further funds as may be necessary and desirable to accomplish any corporate purpose or to comply with the provisions of any agreement made by the corporation or any resolution approved by the corporation. The resolution establishing such a fund shall specify the source of monies from which it shall be funded and the purposes for which monies held in the fund shall be disbursed;

In carrying out the provisions of this article, the corporation shall cooperate with the housing authorities created under Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-69 and Sections 43-33-101 through 43-33-137, Mississippi Code of 1972;

To accept letters of credit and other credit facilities necessary to make loans authorized herein to repay bonds or notes issued by the corporation;

To do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers given and granted in this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 10; Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1991.